tutorial-env/lib/python3.6/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_is.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a4
.að3
.aðal1
.aðl4
.af5á
.af5e
.af1f
.af5le
.af5lo
.af5ló
.af3lö
.af1r
.af1s4
.af5u
.agn3
.al1e
.al2l
.al1s
.al3ú
.am5o
.am4s
.and5æ
.ang3i
.an5kan
.ann4es
.an4s
.ap3ó
.ar2
.ara2b
.arfa5
.ari4
.arth3
.asp5a
.at3o
.austan3
.aþ5
.á1f
.á4fi
.á1g
.á1k
.á5lap
.ála4s
.á5lasa
.álf5r
.á1li
.á3lö
.á3mi
.á3rás
.á1re
.árs3l
.árs3v
.á2ske
.á4skin
.á4stj
.á4sy
.á3ta
.á3v
.b4
.bak3l
.bak3r
.bíl2ar
.borg5ar
.br4
.bra4
.bur4
.d4
.da2
.dag5r
.dan4s
.dav3
.di4
.dr4
.du4
.ed5i
.efri3
.eft5i
.eit5u
.em4b
.endur1
.eng3il
.engl4
.enn3is5
.erl2
.er3li
.es4
.ev5e
.eyf4
.eym4
.é2
.f4
.fa4
.fer3t
.fé5t
.fi4
.fimm5tug
.fir2m
.fisk5r
.fisk3s
.fj4
.fl4
.flug1
.for3k
.fr4
.frá1
.frið1
.frum3b
.g4
.ga4
.gafl5
.gam5a
.gervi3
.gi4
.gja4
.gl4
.gla2
.gn2
.gólf5
.gós4
.gr4
.gras5t
.gri4
.grunn5s
.gu2
.h2
.halds2e
.hár5sv
.hás4i
.her3sk
.himin3
.hrút2a
.i2
.il4l
.ill3u
.in4g
.ingj3
.inn1
.inn5a
.innan3
.inni5s
.í4bi
.í3f
.í3gr
.í3k4
.í5lag
.í5lö
.ím5un
.í2s
.ís1l
.í4str
.í3tak
.í2va
.j4
.ja4
.jár2
.járn5s
.jó5st
.ju4
.jú4
.k4
.ka4
.kab5
.kaffi3
.kj4
.kjöt3
.kla4
.kn2
.kon5sú
.kó4
.kóf5
.kól5e
.kr4
.kra2
.ku4
.kvi4
.l4
.la4
.lag5e
.land5n
.land5r
.lar4
.las5m
.lausa3
.li4
.ló2fa
.lu2
.lúk3a
.lækjar5
.lög1
.m4
.ma2
.mak5i
.mak5r
.mann5afl
.mann1sk
.mar5e
.mar2k
.ma4t
.má4
.málm3
.máva5
.mi4
.min4
.mis3ta
.mót5t
.mu2
.must3
.n4
.na2
.ni2
.niko5
.ný3f
.ný1s
.o4
.of4sa
.of3u4
.or4g5
.or2m
.ot4h
.ó1
.óa4
.ó5at
.óf2
.óg2
.óg4l
.ó3k4
.óla4st
.ó5luk
.óm4a
.ó4mar
.ó3n
.ór4
.ós4a
.ó5sel
.ó3si
.ó3sl
.ós4m
.óst4
.ó3stu
.ó3su
.ó5sú
.ót2
.óta4
.ó3tr
.p4
.pa2
.par2
.park5
.pá4
.pé4
.pl4
.pla4
.plast5
.prjóna5
.pu4
.r4
.ra2
.raf1
.raf3l
.reim5ar
.ri4
.rim2
.rit5r
.rí4
.rjó4
.rosk5i
.rófu5
.ró4s
.ru4
.rum4
.rus4
.rúg5
.s4
.sa2
.sakar5
.sak3l
.salt3s
.saman3
.sam3e
.sand1
.sel5f
.silfur3
.silki3
.sis4
.sj4
.sjón3
.sk4
.ska2
.skerl4
.skr4
.skýja3
.sl4
.sla2
.sm4
.smá5f
.smá3l
.smæl2
.smæ5li
.sn4
.snæ3la
.sótt5
.st4
.sta2
.stein1d
.stein5sn
.stig5r
.stjörnu5r
.str2
.su2
.sum5a
.t4
.ta4
.tar4f
.ti2
.til1
.till4
.til3s
.tólg5
.tr2
.tré3
.tu2
.tví5m
.tvö3
.u2
.uf4
.um1
.um3s
.undan3
.undir5
.un2g
.ur4b
.ur4g
.ur4t
.ut3
.utan1
.ú2
.úr3
.úti1
.út3s
.v4
.val3e
.varp5l
.vel3f
.vi4
.víg5r
.vín5
.von5g
.vor1k
.yf3i
.yfir5
.ý4
.þing5sk
.æð4ist
.æt2
.ætt3
.ættar5
.öfl3
.öfu4
.öl5k
.öl5t
.öl5ví
.öng3u
.ön3u
.ör3s
.ör3u
.örv5ar
.ör5vil
4a1a2
a3ak
2a5á
4a1b4
a3br
abram4
a3bæ
4a1d
a4dam
ad2an
a2dí
adíó5
a3dót
a3dr
ad2u
ad2v
a3dý
a4ð
4aðag
4aðak
aða2l
að4au
að3i
aðja4
að4li
4að2m
aðm3ar
að4ro
að4sól
að2sp
að4sv
3aðu.
að1v
4a3e
5ael.
4afa
af1an
af3ana
af3ar
af5ast.
a5fasta.
a3fata
2afe
af1ei
a3feit
af4fis
af3g
a5fiðu
af2ing
a1fis
4afí
af3ís
2a1fj4
af5lagi
af5lang
af3lei
a2fli
a1flu
af3lý
a3flæk
afn5auð
3afnot
4a2fo
a1fr
af3rei
af1ré
af2rí
afr5ík
af5ræn
af1sa
af4seð
af3sl
5afslá
af3te
af3tö
a1fun
1afurð
2ag
4ag.
4aga
a5galdu
a4gand
ag4are
a5gel
a4geri
a1gil
a1gj
a5glam
agl2an
agl4i
4agn
agnd4
agn5ei
a5gnótt
a1gr
a4gram
ag4rý
ag4ta
a3guð
a3gul
ag3v
ag5yr
a5gö
4a3h
a1i
a5ill
4a1í
aík4
2a1j2
2ak
ak3að
a3kaka
ak3and
ak3ara
ak3arg
ak3ari
a1karl
a1ká
4a1ke
ak5ett
a3kip
a1kj
3akker
akk1l
a3klas
a5klauf
ak3lei
ak3lin
a3klo
a1ko
a1kó
akr4u
ak2s
ak3ste
aks5ve
ak4tí
ak4uð
a3kul
ak3ur
a1kv
a1ky
a5ký
a3kæ
a1kö
2ala
al1að
a2laf
ala5fa
a1lag
alam4
a1land
a3lang
a1lau
a1lá
4alák
2a3lán
ald4ans
alding4
al4dre
aldurn4
2ale
al3em
5alems
al3er
4a3lé
al1f4
al1g
al5gu
a3liðu
4a3lind
alis4
a1list
4a3lit
2a1lí
5alíb
4a1lj
alk2
al3ku
all3d
all1i
all5is
all4sky
all4te
all5ær
al1m
alm4ar
al4mat
alm4i
al4mo
al3mu
a1lo
4alof
4alog
al5om
4aló
a5lóð
a3lómu
a3lón
al5til
al5ul
a3l4un
al5ún
alv4
2a1ly
4a1lý
2a1læ
2a1lö
2am
amak4
am1al
am3ans
am3anv
amar4f
am5aum
a1má
am3áb
a3mál
am5áve
amb5á
a1mi4
a1mj
am3ku
amm5d4
a5mót
am5pí
am4sm
am1t
5amtm
a3mun
amur4
am3úr
3an.
an4aðr
2anafn
4a1nau
2aná
a4nár
3anát
an2d
and1e
and3ó
andr5és
ands4e
4andu
4ane
a4n5ei
ang3d
angi4s
an4gl
angr1u
ang3ræ
4anib
4anið
3anir
anis4m
an5íe
an5ín
2a5njó
an4ke
an4ky
3anl
ann1d
an3nef
2anni
4annk
4ann5l
ann3o
4anns
anns5lá
ann1t
4annu
4a1no
a3nór
2a3nót
ant4sk
5antý
1a4nu
4a5nud
3anum
4anú
an3úa
a3núp
5anúr
4anyk
2aný
a5nýr
a5nýt
anz5
2anæ
4anö
a5o
4a1ó
ap3að
ap5ald
ap3ar
a1pe
a5pils
ap3ít
ap4íu
4apl
a3plast
a1po
1apót
a1pr
ap5rau
ap4r3í
a1pun
a5pör
1ar
3ar.
ar5a2b5í
4aradí
ar1að
4araða
ar4aðan
4araðh
2araðir
araf4l
ar1afl.
ar5afli
a5rafma
ara3fo
4araft
4arafv
ar5agð
4arak.
ara5m
ar1an
2arann
ar3anna
4aranns
ar4ar4á
arar4fa
4arart
ara5ræ
2a5rass
arat4a
ar1au
4a3raun
4araup
ar4aus
a4rá.
4a5ráð
ar5áf
ar1áh
3a4r1ák
3ar1ál
2arán
3a4r1ár
a2r1ás
4arása
ar1át
3aráæ
2arð
arðar4ma
arð4sen
4ared
ar1ef
5arefn
a5refs
4a5refu
2a1reg
3ar3egg
ar3eiður
2areik
4areim
ar1ein
2a1rek
ar1el
4arell
ar1end
ar5eng
2a3renn
ar3er
ar3et
ar5ey.
ar5eyg
a3reyk
ar3eyr
4a1ré
ar4fár
arf3t
4arg.
arg4e
ar3gil
args4v
ar3guð
3arhó
4arid
ar1ið
4ariða
4ariði
4arif
4arig
4arim
a5rima
ar5in
4arit
4ariþ
2arí
ar5ía
ar3ín
ar3ít
arí4uss
ar1j2
4arjú
ark3ar
arkar3l
ar1kj
ark2s
arks3v
4arl.
ar3lu
4armar.
4armg
armi4
ar3mun
2arn.
4arna.
4arnin
arns5l
ar5od
4a5roð
2a5rof.
ar5ofs
ar3on
5ar5op
2aró
ar3óða
4aróg
ar3ól
ar5ón
3ar5óp
ar5ór
4arp.
ar4plö
4arrað
3arrá
4arri.
ar5rug
ar4skæ
ar5slag.
ar3sli
ars4p
arst4
ar3su
4arta.
ar1u
4a5r2uð
ar2un
4aruna
ar3ung
4arunu
ar1ú
4arúð
2arúm
2arún
4a5rús
arv4
ar1y
4aryk
4aryt
4arý
a3rýr
2a1ræ
a2ræði
a4ræs
2arö
a1röð
5ar5ög
5aröld
a3r4ös
a1s2
2asa
as3að
asa5fl
3asdó
a3se
as5ið.
as5inu
as5is
a4sía
a4sín
2asj
2ask
a2skað
ask3ara
ask5ín
2asl
a3slá
a5sleð
asl4i
a3slóð
asl4u
a3slö
2asm
a4smu
4asn4
4aso
as3r
3asson
as5sp
ass5vi
as4sö
a2st
1ast.
a5stagl
1asti.
a3stil
ast2ing
3astir.
a3stí
4astj
4asto
4a3stó
a3strau
a3stun
a3stú
4a3stæ
4astö
4a3su
4asv
a5sy
4asæ
4asö
at5aðu
a3tafl
atag4
a1tak
a1tal
at2an
a3tang
at3arí
a3tá
3atbu
4a1te
a4tef
a5ter
a5teyg
1ath
at4he
a1til
at4ind
4atí
at3ínu
a2t5ís
atj2
3atkv
at4li
atnefj4
at4no
a3tól.
at5óls
at5ram
at1rei
1at1ri
a5tröð
at4seld
at4t
4atu
a3tug
a1t2un
a1tú
at1v
3atvik
4a1tæ
4a3tö
a2u4
4auða
4auði
auð3l
5auðn.
4auf
auf3ar
auf3á
auf5i
auf3l
augs5v
3auki
4aul
a4um.
aum3að
4aum3b
a5umbú
4a3umd
4aumf
aum2k
aum5ó
2aun
a3undir
aun3dr
aungr4
2aup
aup3e
a3upp
a4ur
aust3u
4aut
aut5lan
aut3r
a5ú
2a1v
av4a
a3ve
avi4
av5ía
a1y
1az
3azt
4a1þ
a5þa
4a5æ
a1ö
á1a
á2af
á4alo
á4alu
á5b
á1d4
4á4ð
áð4al
áð3l
áð2sk
áð4sö
áð2u
áð3ug
áðu4m
áð3v4
á1e
áf3að
á3fang
áf4ar
áfeng5is3
á3fj
á1fl
áfna5
áfor2
áform5að
á1fr
á2fu
ágar4
ágl4
á1gr4
ág3st
águð4
á1h
4á1i
áin4
áins5
á5j
4ák.
áka4f
ákal4
ák5an
ákap4
á3ká
á3ke
á4ki
á5kj
4ákn
á1ko
ákot4
ák4uð
ák2un
á5kú
á1kv
á4ky
á5kyn
á1kæ
4ál.
ál2a
ál3að
á1lag
á4lagar
á3land
ál3ann
ál3ans
ál3ara
á3lá
ál4dæ
ál1ef
ál4ei
á3les
ál2f
4álg
á4l1ið
á1lit
á1lí
ál3l
ál2m
álm3ar
álm3u
álp3
áls3ei
ál5skot
áls3l
ál4sæ
ál3ug
á5lund
ál5ún
á1ly
4álæ
ál3æð
á5læg
2ám2
ámarks3
á3má
ám3ið
ám3sk
ám4skr
áms3v
án4arr
á3nau
á2ney
á5no
án2s
án4st
án3t
á3ný
á1næ
á3o
á5ó
4áp
á5pí
áraf4a
ár1an
ár5ák
ár5ent
á4reyr
á3ré
árf4
ár1g
ár5gr
ár4is
ár1k
ár3m
árns2
á1róð
ár3ós
árr4i
3ársda
ár4sin
ár2sn
ár4so
ár2st
ár2sv
ár1t2
ár3un
árv4
3árvirk
á1ræ
á3saka
á3sau
á3sá
á3sei
á4sen
4ásin
á1sk
á2ska
ás5kels
ás2l
ás5lau
ás4ma
á1stan
á4st3ar3
á4stef
ástr5al
á3stun
át5að
á1te
á5tig
át2ind
át4skr
át4sæ
átt5r
átt3s
átt3ug
á1tæ
á1tö
á1u
áuk4
á1v
á2va
á5val
á4var.
áv4i
5ávöx
á5y
á5ý
á1þ
1á1æ
á5ö
b2a2
4ba.
bak3a
bak5v
bal2
balb5
ball3
bals5
ba3me
1ban
4ban.
bank5ann
4bant
bar4k
5bar4n
barn2s
barn5æ
4batr
bá4
2b2b
bb3að
bb5ald
bb5ar
bb5ast.
bb3i
bb3un
b2e
bel4
ber4g
berg3l
berg5r
ber3sk
b1h
bi2
4bi.
bið4lag
bif1
bi5luk
b4ind
b4inga
bir4
birki5l
bisk5
bit4s
4bí.
4bía
4bín
bís4
bít2s
1bj4
bjar2
björ2
b2l2
4bl.
4bla.
3blað
blá3g
blá5l
bli4
bló4
blóð1
4bls
blý1
1bo
4bod
bor4g
1bó
4bó.
bóg5l
bó4k
bók3l
bók5r
bók3v
ból2
bó4n
b3ótt
b2r2
bra2
4bra.
br3ar
bri4
brim3
bró4
4brót
br4u
brú5ar
2bs
b4sel
b4sp
b4sæ
b2u
bul5f
bur2
1b4urð
burða5rás
b3urh
bu2s
1bú
búd2
bú1f4
bú3la
4bú3m
bú1re
bú1s
bú3sk
bú3st
bús4v
1by
bý3fl
býl5i
1bær
1bö
böðv3
c2a4
c4l
cla4
co4
c5ob
ct5
cu4
2da.
d1að
d4a1f4
da3fo
5dagað
dag5n
3dags
3dagur
da1k
1dal.
da3lið
dalm4
da1ma4
d5ams
d1an
d2ana
dand5a
d4aní
dap4a
2dar
dar4aða
da4rau
d4arey
dar5f
dar1g4
da3rís
d4arof
dar3t
da4ræt
dat2
3dauðu
d5aug
d5auk
da3um
da3up
d4ál
5dálk
dá4m
d4ána
4d1b
2dd
dd3e
d4di
d4dý
d5dýr
de4
1deil
d4ek
d2em
4demís
d1eo3
d1eó
d2ep
5depi
4der
d5ér
d1f4
dfæt4l
4d1g2
dgl4
dgu4
dg5un
4d1h
dhár4
d1i
2di.
dif4
d3ils
dim4
di3ma
3dimm
din5a2v5
di5ne
2dio
2dió
dirr4
di3ræ
dis5l
di4st
d4isto
dí2
d3íð
2d3ín
4d1íó
1dís
3dís.
3dísar
4dísk
dj4
3djar2
3djú
5djöfu
d3k2
d1l
dl5að
d4lak
dl2i4
2d3m2
d3ný
4do.
d5olf
dorn5
dó2
d3óf
1d4óm
1dór
dós3e
d4ótti
4d1p
4dq
4dra.
dra2g
5drag.
5draga
dramb4u
d5rana
d3ráð
3drát
1dreg
3drep
d5rik
d5rim
d5ríð
5drjúg
d5roð
5drop
dró4
dr3un.
dr1una
d3rún
3drykk
3dræg
d5ræn
d4ræp
2ds
d4seld
d5sím
d1sk4
d2skj
d4skra
d4skrí
ds5kv
ds1l
d4smi
dsn4
d4s3ne
d2só
d2spr
d4spö
ds3s
d1st2
d4stin
d4stí
d2s5tæk
d5sval
d3svar
ds5ver
ds1vi
ds5vo
d2sy
d5syn
d4sæð
d4sæv
d2söf
2d1t2
d1u
5duft
duk4
du2l
du3le
dum4
d4umb
d4up
durf4
dur4st
d4uræ
d3ust.
dú4
5dúf
1dúk
d1v4
4dvé
d3w
5dyr.
1dý
4d1þ
1dæ4
4dær
1dög
ð1að
ða1f4
ða3fo
ð3aft
ða1g4
ða1k4
ð5ak.
ð1al
ða1la
ða5land
ða2lá
ðal1t
ða4lu
ða1m
ð1an
ðan3át
ðang4a
ð4any
ða3p4
ðar1
ða4rau
ð4ar4eið
ðarf4
ðar3fl
ð4ar4is
ðark4
ðar3m
ð4arof
ða2ræ
ðas4
ða3sl
ð3asta.
ða3ste
ða3str
ð5astur
ða1t2
ð1au
ð1á
ð1b
ðband4
ð1d2
ð1e
ð3f4
ðfj4
ð1g2
ð2gi
ð5gil
ð3gir
ðg5is
ðg4l
ð3gul
ðg3un
ð1h
ð1i
ði1d
ði1f
ði3g4
ði1k4
ði3lag
ð3ill
ð3ils
ðils4v
ði1m
ði3ne
ð4ino
ðin4s3
ð4iny
ð4irj
ðisk4
ði4sl
ð4isó
ðis3s
ð4isú
ði3t
ðj3að
ð3jarð
ð3jó
ð4ju
ð1jö
ð1k
ð2ka
ðk3að
ð3kal
ðkamb4
ðk2i
ðk2un
ð1l
ð2la
ðl3að
ð3lag
ð5lang
ð4las
ð3lau
ð2li
ðl2in
ðl1is
ð3lit
ð3lund
ð1m
ð3má
ðmál4s
ðm2i
ð5mí
ðn1
ðn2e
ðn4is4v
ðn3n
ðn4o
ðn4y
ð3ný
ð1næ
ð1o
ð1ó
ð1p4
ðr1að
ðrap4
ð1ráð
ðr3át
ð1re
ð4ref
ð1ré
ð5riði
ðr3il
ðr4ist
ðris4v
ð1rí
ð3ro
ðr1un
ð5rý
ð1ræ
ð3rö
ð1sa
ð3sam
ð2sau
ð4seð
ð5sem
ðs4in.
ðs4ir
ð1sk
ð4skak
ðs5kv
ðs5kön
ð3slit
ð3slæg
ð3smj
ð1sn4
ð4snæ
ð4sóm
ðs3s
ð1st2
ð4stá
ð4steg
ð5sun
ð1svei
ðs3ver
ðs3vö
ð1t2
ðta2
ð1u
ðu3f
ð3ugl
ð3ugu
ð3ull
ð3uls
ðu1m
ð5und
ð5ung
ð3ur1
ður5am
ð4ur4ó
ðurr4
ður5sá
ður4spe
ðurt2
ð4urun
ð3ust.
ðu1t
ð3ú
ð1ve
ð1vi4
ð1ví
ðvít5
ðv1u
ð1væ
ð1vö
ð1y
ð5ý
ð1þ
ð3æ
ð3ö
e3as
4eb
eb3en
eben3e
ebr3
4eða
eða2l1
eð4are
eð3il
eð2is
eð4j
eðlis5
eð4ri
eð2st
eð3v4
e2f
2ef.
ef3að
efa5g
e3fald
ef3an
ef3ar
ef5ast.
ef3á
ef4fe
ef3i
4efj
efj3að
efj3ar
efl5andi
ef5le
ef4n
ef4r
ef2s
efsi5f
ef3sk
3eftirl
ef4tí
eft4s
2efu
e4g
eg1as
eg2g
egg3l4
egg3v
eg5i4
4egl
egl5að
egn5s
egn5u
egr3u
eg4sag
eg4stæ
4eg3u
egul1
e4i2
4ei.
4eiði
ei4f
eif3ar
eif4ara
eifl4i
1eigand
5eige
1eign
2eik
eik3an
eik5á
eik3le
eik3va
2eil
eil5agr
eil5agt
eilf4
ei3lí
ei4m
eim5b
eim5ó
ein3e
ein5g2
5einkunn
ein1ó
ein3æ
ein5ö
eir5á
eir3f
ei3rí
eir3m
eir5t
2ei4s
eis4l
eisl3i
eislis5
eisn3
eist5að
4eita
eit3ung
e2k
ek3að
ek3an
ek3á
ekk3v
4ek2s
eks4l
ek3ú
e4l
el3á
eld3is
el4dr
el1e
el4ef
elf3in
el5ið
elim4
el1í
elík4
el2l
el5lá
el4le
elm4a
el5mar
el4ská
elst4an
el3tj
elv4
e2m
em1a
em3an
emb3a
em1e
em3i
em5ía
em2l
em4m
em2s
e2n
4en.
ena4t
end4r
ene3d
en4ga
eng3u
en2kj
4enn
ennsl3i
en3o
en3ó
ens5í
en4sta
en4t
ent3ug
eom4
e3on
e5or
eóm4
e4p
ep2h
ep3i
3epli
eps4l
ep4t3
e2r
er1a
er1á
er4di
erð4arj
er1e
erf3ast
er4fi
erf3ið
er2fu
erf5ul
erfæt4l
er2g
er3gir
er3i4
er3í
er4j
4er2k
erk5ann
er2l
erl3is
er2m
er4mi
er3mó
er4nes
ern5i
er5o
er5ól
5ersen.
er4sí
er2sk
ers4la
er2sn
er4sú
ert5is
er4ug
er1un
er5und
er3ú
er2v
erv4a
erv5ing
ervit2
er5æf
er3ö
e4s2
es3a
es4af
es4as
5esdó
es3e
es3i
4esj
es5kjö
es5kot
es3má
es3ót
es3pr
es4t
est5ana.
est3is
est5í
est2s
est5ö
es3um
es3v
e4t
et5að
et3e
et2he
et4hú
et3il
et4ist
4etl
et2li
et3rau
et4ska
et4skr
et4tr
e5vet
5evr
e2y
ey3b
5eyðub
4eyf
1eygður
5eyingu
2eyk
2eym
4eyp
é5b
é1d
éfa3s
éf4sk
é1g4
é1h
é1l
élags3
élat4
él5g
él5in
él3k
él1s4
él4sky
é1m
é4mó
é4na
é4ni
én2s
ér1
ér2e
ér4ti
ér4ul
é1s
ést4
3étinn
é4tr
étt5e
étt5h
étur4
é3v
f2a2
4fa.
fa3a
fa3b
fa3d
f1að
f3að.
f3aða
f3aði.
f3aðu
f4a3f
fa3ga
fa3ge
fagra3
1fagu
4fa3k4
fa3lau
f3ald.
4fa3le
fa3lí
1fall
fal4len
fal4s
fa5læ
4fa3m
f5ana.
f3and
fa3ne
3fang.
f3ani
f5aní
f3anna.
5fantu
f4a3p
f4are
fa5rei
fa3rí
4faro
f4arö
